src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s57_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sita: # 
    sita+V+Inf: sita
    sita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: situr
    sita+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sat
    sita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sótu
    sita+V+Sup: sitið
